Illinois, session 104th, SB2231.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 521 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products 6Act is amended by changing Section 2 and by adding Section 1.6 7as follows: 8    (720 ILCS 675/1.6 new)9    Sec. 1.6. Manufacturer requirements; electronic 10cigarettes. 11(a) Before electronic cigarettes may be sold in this State, 12each manufacturer of such products shall register its 13electronic cigarette products with the Department of Revenue 14and shall submit an affidavit to the Department of Revenue in 15substantially the following form:16ILLINOIS AFFIDAVIT FOR ATTESTATION OF ELECTRONIC CIGARETTES 17PRODUCTS 18Affiant hereby states and affirms that:19        (1) (name of manufacturer)_........is the manufacturer 20    of an electronic cigarette product that is sold or 21    intended to be sold in this State, whether directly or 22    indirectly, or through a distributor, retailer, or similar 23    intermediary or intermediaries.  SB2231- 2 -LRB104 10168 BDA 20240 b1        (2) (manufacturer representative)....... attests that 2    this product was available for purchase in the United 3    States as of (date available), and the manufacturer has 4    applied for a marketing order for the electronic cigarette 5    product by submitting a Premarket Tobacco Product 6    Application on or before (date of application), to the 7    United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or has 8    received a marketing order or other authorization for the 9    electronic cigarette product from the FDA pursuant to 10    Section 387j of Title 21 of the United States Code.11        (3) (manufacturer)_...... shall notify the Department 12    of Revenue within 30 days of any material change to the 13    attestation, including whether the FDA has issued or not 14    issued a market order or other authorization or has 15    ordered the manufacturer to remove the electronic 16    cigarette product, either temporarily or permanently, from 17    the United States market.18        (4) (manufacturer)........ understands that it is 19    unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, to 20    knowingly manufacture, distribute, sell, barter, or 21    furnish in this State any electronic cigarette product 22    that is not included in the directory. The Department of 23    Revenue is relying on information provided in the 24    aforesaid affidavit as to your authority to sell or 25    distribute these products in Illinois. If the Department 26    of Revenue is not advised in writing of authorization for   SB2231- 3 -LRB104 10168 BDA 20240 b1    a product to be sold or distributed in Illinois so that it 2    may be placed in the directory, it will be deemed an 3    unlawful product.4    Date:........... 5    (Company name) 6    Subscribed and sworn to before me this_....day of ....20.. 7    Notary Public............ 8    My Commission Expires:......9    Commission No....... 10    (b) The information described in subsection (a) shall be 11compiled in a registry maintained by the Department of 12Revenue, updated daily, and made publicly available on the 13Department's website.14    (c) The Department of Revenue, the Department of Public 15Health, the Attorney General, and local law enforcement 16agencies shall enforce the provisions of this Section by 17seizing electronic cigarette products that are not in 18compliance with this Section. 19    (d) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules to enforce 20this Section.  21    (720 ILCS 675/2)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2358)22    Sec. 2. Penalties. 23    (a) Any person who violates subsection (a), (a-5), 24(a-5.1), (a-5.2), (a-8), (b), or (d) of Section 1 of this Act 25is guilty of a petty offense. For the first offense in a   SB2231- 4 -LRB104 10168 BDA 20240 b124-month period, the person shall be fined $200 if his or her 2employer has a training program that facilitates compliance 3with minimum-age tobacco laws. For the second offense in a 424-month period, the person shall be fined $400 if his or her 5employer has a training program that facilitates compliance 6with minimum-age tobacco laws. For the third offense in a 724-month period, the person shall be fined $600 if his or her 8employer has a training program that facilitates compliance 9with minimum-age tobacco laws. For the fourth or subsequent 10offense in a 24-month period, the person shall be fined $800 if 11his or her employer has a training program that facilitates 12compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws. For the purposes of 13this subsection, the 24-month period shall begin with the 14person's first violation of the Act. The penalties in this 15subsection are in addition to any other penalties prescribed 16under the Cigarette Tax Act and the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 171995.18    (a-5) Any retailer who violates subsection (a), (a-5), 19(a-5.1), (a-5.2), (a-8), (b), or (d) of Section 1 of this Act 20is guilty of a petty offense. For the first offense in a 2124-month period, the retailer shall be fined $200 if it does 22not have a training program that facilitates compliance with 23minimum-age tobacco laws. For the second offense in a 24-month 24period, the retailer shall be fined $400 if it does not have a 25training program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age 26tobacco laws. For the third offense within a 24-month period,   SB2231- 5 -LRB104 10168 BDA 20240 b1the retailer shall be fined $600 if it does not have a training 2program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco 3laws. For the fourth or subsequent offense in a 24-month 4period, the retailer shall be fined $800 if it does not have a 5training program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age 6tobacco laws. For the purposes of this subsection, the 724-month period shall begin with the person's first violation 8of the Act. The penalties in this subsection are in addition to 9any other penalties prescribed under the Cigarette Tax Act and 10the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995.11    (a-6) For the purpose of this Act, a training program that 12facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws must 13include at least the following elements: (i) it must explain 14that only individuals displaying valid identification 15demonstrating that they are 21 years of age or older shall be 16eligible to purchase tobacco products, electronic cigarettes, 17or alternative nicotine products and (ii) it must explain 18where a clerk can check identification for a date of birth. The 19training may be conducted electronically. Each retailer that 20has a training program shall require each employee who 21completes the training program to sign a form attesting that 22the employee has received and completed tobacco training. The 23form shall be kept in the employee's file and may be used to 24provide proof of training.25    (a-7) A manufacturer who violates Section 1.6 is guilty of 26a Class A misdemeanor.   SB2231- 6 -LRB104 10168 BDA 20240 b1    (b) If a person under 21 years of age violates subsection 2(a-6) of Section 1, he or she is guilty of a Class A 3misdemeanor. 4    (c) (Blank).5    (d) (Blank).6    (e) (Blank).7    (f) (Blank).8    (g) (Blank).9    (h) All moneys collected as fines for violations of 10subsection (a), (a-5), (a-5.1), (a-6), (a-7) (a-8), (b), or 11(d) of Section 1 shall be distributed in the following manner:12        (1) one-half of each fine shall be distributed to the 13    unit of local government or other entity that successfully 14    prosecuted the offender; and15        (2) one-half shall be remitted to the State to be used 16    for enforcing this Act. 17    Any violation of subsection (a) or (a-5) of Section 1 or 18Section 1.6 shall be reported to the Department of Revenue 19within 7 business days. 20(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-937, eff. 1-1-25.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.